Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.216.250 and 2021 c 304 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:It shall be the secretary's duty with regard to licensing under this chapter:(1) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, and subject to RCW 43.216.255, to designate categories of child care facilities or outdoor locations for which separate or different requirements shall be developed as may be appropriate whether because of variations in the ages and other characteristics of the children served, variations in the purposes and services offered or size or structure of the agencies to be licensed, or because of any other factor relevant thereto;(2)(a) In consultation with the state fire marshal's office, the secretary shall use an interagency process to address health and safety requirements for child care programs that serve school-age children and are operated in buildings that contain public or private schools that safely serve children during times in which school is in session;(b) Any requirements in (a) of this subsection as they relate to the physical facility, including outdoor playgrounds, do not apply to before-school and after-school programs that serve only school-age children and operate in the same facilities used by public or private schools;(3) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of parents or guardians((,)) and persons representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, and subject to RCW 43.216.255, to adopt and publish minimum requirements for licensing applicable to each of the various categories of agencies to be licensed under this chapter;(4) In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the secretary shall investigate the conviction record or pending charges of each agency and its staff seeking licensure or relicensure, and other persons having unsupervised access to children in child care;(5) To satisfy the shared background check requirements provided for in RCW 43.216.270 and 43.20A.710, the department of children, youth, and families and the department of social and health services shall share federal fingerprint-based background check results as permitted under the law. The purpose of this provision is to allow both departments to fulfill their joint background check responsibility of checking any individual who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles. Neither department may share the federal background check results with any other state agency or person;(6) To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to this chapter. Licenses shall specify the category of child care that an agency is authorized to render and the ages and number of children to be served;(7) To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents of reports necessary for the administration of this chapter and to require regular reports from each licensee;(8) To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether or not there is compliance with this chapter and the requirements adopted under this chapter;(9) To review requirements adopted under this chapter at least every two years and to adopt appropriate changes after consultation with affected groups for child care requirements; and(10) To consult with public and private agencies in order to help them improve their methods and facilities for the care and early learning of children.Sec. 2. RCW 43.216.255 and 2021 c 304 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No later than November 1, 2016, the department shall implement a single set of licensing standards for child care and the early childhood education and assistance program. The department shall produce the single set of licensing standards within the department's available appropriations. The new licensing standards must:(a) Provide minimum licensing requirements for child care and preschool programs, subject to subsection (2) of this section;(b) Rely on the standards established in the early achievers program to address quality issues in participating early childhood programs;(c) Take into account the separate needs of family care providers, outdoor nature-based child care providers, and child care centers; and(d) Promote the continued safety of child care settings.(2) The licensing standards established and implemented by the department must align with the following:(a) Providers may not be required to earn early childhood education certification or equivalent credentials as part of staff qualification requirements;(b) For each classroom or well-defined space of a child care center, the maximum group sizes and ratios of center staff members to children, including children related to staff or the licensee, must be:(i) For preschoolers (30 months through six years of age who are not attending kindergarten or elementary school), a maximum group size of 21 with a ratio of no less than one to 11; and(ii) For school-age children (five years through 12 years of age who are enrolled in or attending kindergarten or elementary school), a maximum group size of 31 with a ratio of no less than one to 16; and(c) Licensed indoor early learning program space must have a minimum of 34 square feet per child in attendance and further comply with the requirements of this chapter.(3) Private schools that operate early learning programs and do not receive state subsidy payments shall be subject to the minimum health and safety standards as defined in RCW 43.216.395(2)(b), the health and safety requirements under chapter 28A.195 RCW, and the requirements necessary to assure a sufficient early childhood education to meet usual requirements needed for transition into elementary school. The state, and any agency thereof, shall not restrict or dictate any specific educational or other programs for early learning programs operated by private schools except for programs that receive state subsidy payments.Sec. 3. RCW 43.216.600 and 2021 c 199 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall provide professional development supports to aid eligible providers in reaching the professional education and training standards adopted by the department. Professional development supports may include:(a) Department-required trainings for child care providers conducted by department-approved trainers;(b) Trainings for license-exempt family, friend, and neighbor child care providers conducted by department-approved trainers;(c) Early achievers scholarships;(d) ((Community-based training pathways and systems developed under RCW 43.216.755;(e))) Supporting a nonprofit organization that provides relationship-based professional development support to family, friend, and neighbor caregivers, child care centers, and licensed family home providers, and their work to help providers start their businesses; and(((f)))(e) Other professional development activities such as updating training content, data collection and reporting, trainer recruitment, retention, program monitoring, and trainings delivered by department-approved trainers on topics such as small business management, antibias and antiracist training, providing care for children with developmental disabilities, social-emotional learning, implementing inclusionary practices in early learning environments, infant and toddler care, dual language program development, and providing trauma-informed care.(2) For the purposes of this section, "eligible provider" means: (a) An owner of a licensed or certified child care center, licensed or certified outdoor nature-based care, or licensed family home provider accepting state subsidy; (b) an employee of a licensed or certified child care center, licensed or certified outdoor nature-based care, or a licensed family home provider; (c) a contractor or provider of the early childhood education and assistance program or birth to three early childhood education and assistance program; or (d) an early achievers coach.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. RCW 43.216.755 (Child care providersâCommunity-based training pathway) and 2020 c 342 s 2 are each repealed.--- END ---